src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv27_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    rás+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: rás
    rás+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: rás
    rás+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: rás
    rás+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: rásar
    rás+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: [rásir, ræsur]
    rás+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: rásum
    rás+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: rása
    rás+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: rásin
    rás+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: rásina
    rás+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: rásini
    rás+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: rásarinnar
    rás+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: [rásirnar, ræsurnar]
    rás+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: rásunum
    rás+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: rásanna
